Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Guardian Ad Litem Transparency and Oversight Panel

§ 9-21-101.
Guardian Ad Litem Transparency and Oversight Panel created; composition; duties [Repealed effective December 31, 2020].

The Guardian Ad Litem Transparency and Oversight Panel is created to address and investigate the appointment of guardians ad litem as required by statute or ordered by a court, determine the frequency of such appointments, and compile an analysis of the costs to the various counties and to parties. The Chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, Subdivision A, shall chair the panel. The other members shall be the following fourteen (14) persons:

The Chair of the Conference of Chancery Court Judges, or a designee;

The Chair of the Conference of County Court Judges, or a designee;

The Chair of the Council of Youth Court Judges, or a designee;

A youth court referee appointed by the Chair of the Council of Youth Court Judges;

The Chair of the Senate Judiciary Committee, Division B, or a designee;

The Senate Chair of the Investigate State Offices Joint Committee;

The Chair of the House of Representatives Judiciary “A” Committee, or a designee;

The Chair of the House of Representatives Judiciary “B” Committee, or a designee;

The Chair of the House of Representatives Youth and Family Affairs Committee, or a designee;

The Director of the Administrative Office of Courts, or a designee;

The Director of the Mississippi Judicial College, or a designee;

Two (2) attorneys who are regularly appointed as guardians ad litem, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court; and

A youth court prosecutor appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

All appointed members of the panel shall be appointed within thirty (30) days of April 1, 2017. Members of the panel shall serve without compensation.

A vacancy in the panel shall not affect its powers, but shall be filled as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section. The task force shall hold its first meeting within sixty (60) days of April 1, 2017, on the call of the chairperson of the task force. A majority of the membership of the panel shall constitute a quorum, and the panel shall meet at the call of the chairperson, or upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the panel. All members must be notified in writing of all meetings at least five (5) days before the date on which a meeting of the panel is scheduled.

The duties of the panel shall be to:

Compile and analyze the information required to be submitted in Section 9-5-91, and ultimately to recommend legislation to improve the guardian ad litem system.

Assess the feasibility and potential benefit or detriment of counties employing a full-time guardian ad litem and make a finding and recommendation.

Report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature by December 1 of each year of its existence.

The Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Joint Committee of the Legislature shall assist the panel in carrying out its duties required by this section. The Director of the Joint Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall designate an appropriate employee to act as a point of contact for staff support to the panel. In addition, the panel may consult with employees of any state agency or department necessary to accomplish the panel’s responsibilities under this section.

This section shall stand repealed on December 31, 2020.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 418, § 1, eff from and after Apr. 1, 2017.